Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3608
Minor traffic violations; pretrial
diversion program; eligibility.

Any driver holding a commercial
driver's license or CLP-commercial
learner's permit issued pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act shall
not be eligible to participate in a program under sections 29-3605 to 29-3609
if such participation would be in noncompliance with federal law or regulation
and subject the state to possible loss of federal funds.

Laws 2002, LB 1303, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 562, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 76, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB178, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 1.

Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, see section 60-462.